Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1755.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 297A.99, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Authorization; scope. (a) A political subdivision of this state may impose a general sales tax (1) under section 297A.9915, (2) under section 297A.992, (3) under section 297A.9925, (4) under section 297A.993, (5) if permitted by special law, or (6) if the political subdivision enacted and imposed the tax before January 1, 1982, and its predecessor provision. (b) This section governs the imposition of a general sales tax by the political subdivision. The provisions of this section preempt the provisions of any special law: (1) enacted before June 2, 1997deleted text begin , ordeleted text end new text begin ;new text end (2) enacted on or after June 2, 1997, that does not explicitly exempt the special law provision from this section's rules by referencedeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; ornew text end new text begin (3) enacted before July 1, 2025. new text end (c) This section does not apply to or preempt a sales tax on motor vehicles. Beginning July 1, 2019, no political subdivision may impose a special excise tax on motor vehicles unless it is imposed under section 297A.993. (d) A political subdivision may not advertise or expend funds for the promotion of a referendum to support imposing a local sales tax and may only spend funds related to imposing a local sales tax to: (1) conduct the referendum; (2) disseminate information included in the resolution adopted under subdivision 2, but only if the disseminated information includes a list of specific projects and the cost of each individual project; (3) provide notice of, and conduct public forums at which proponents and opponents on the merits of the referendum are given equal time to express their opinions on the merits of the referendum; (4) provide facts and data on the impact of the proposed local sales tax on consumer purchases; and (5) provide facts and data related to the individual programs and projects to be funded with the local sales tax. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 297A.99, subdivision 1a, is amended to read: Subd. 1a. Requirements. Local sales taxes are to be used instead of traditional local revenues only for construction and rehabilitation of capital projects when a clear regional benefit beyond the taxing jurisdiction can be demonstrated. deleted text begin Use of local sales tax revenues for local projects decreases the benefits to taxpayers of the deductibility of local property taxes and the state assistance provided through the property tax refund system and increases the fiscal inequities between similar communities.deleted text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 297A.99, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Legislative authority required before voter approval; requirements for adoption, use, termination. (a) A political subdivision must receive legislative authority to impose a local sales tax before submitting the tax for approval by voters of the political subdivision. Imposition of a local sales tax is subject to approval by voters of the political subdivision at a general election. The election must be conducted at a general election within the two-year period after the governing body of the political subdivision has received authority to impose the tax. If the authorizing legislation allows the tax to be imposed for more than one project, there must be a separate question approving the use of the tax revenue for each project. Notwithstanding the authorizing legislation, a project that is not approved by the voters may not be funded with the local sales tax revenue and the deleted text begin termination date of the tax setdeleted text end new text begin total amount for all projects allowednew text end in the authorizing legislation must be reduced deleted text begin proportionately based on the share of that project's cost to the total costs of all projects included in the authorizing legislationdeleted text end new text begin accordinglynew text end . (b) The proceeds of the tax must be dedicated exclusively to payment of the construction and rehabilitation costs and associated bonding costs related to the specific capital improvement projects that were approved by the voters under paragraph (a).new text begin The political subdivision must not commingle revenue from a tax for a project or projects approved by the voters under this section with revenue from a local sales tax authorized under section 297A.9901 or any other law, ordinance, city charter, or other provision, including an extension of or modification to the uses of a local sales tax for a different project.new text end (c)new text begin The political subdivision imposing the tax must notify the commissioner at least 90 days before the date the political subdivision anticipates that revenues raised from the tax are sufficient to fund the projects approved by the voters under paragraph (a). The notification applies to each authorization of a tax and each project approved by the voters under paragraph (a), regardless of whether the legislature has authorized the tax notwithstanding the requirements of paragraph (d).new text end The tax must terminate after the revenues raised are sufficient to fund the projects approved by the voters under paragraph (a).new text begin The political subdivision must notify the commissioner within 30 days of the date that sufficient revenues have been raised to fund the projects approved by the voters under paragraph (a).new text end (d) After a sales tax imposed by a political subdivision has expired or been terminated, the political subdivision is prohibited from imposing a local sales tax for a period of one year. deleted text begin (e) Notwithstanding paragraph (a), if a political subdivision received voter approval to seek authority for a local sales tax at the November 6, 2018, general election and is granted authority to impose a local sales tax before January 1, 2021, the tax may be imposed without an additional referendum provided that it meets the requirements of subdivision 2 and the list of specific projects contained in the resolution does not conflict with the projects listed in the approving referendum. deleted text end deleted text begin (f)deleted text end new text begin (e)new text end If a tax is terminated because sufficient revenues have been raised, any amount of tax collected under subdivision 9, after sufficient revenues have been raised and before the quarterly termination required under subdivision 12, paragraph (a), that is greater than the average quarterly revenues collected over the immediately preceding 12 calendar months must be retained by the commissioner for deposit in the general fund. new text begin (f) The total tax rate imposed by a political subdivision under this section or any other law, ordinance, or city charter and section 297A.9901 must not exceed one-half of one percent, except that this limit does not apply to taxes authorized under this section or any other law, ordinance, or city charter before June 1, 2023. Upon expiration of a tax authorized under this section or any other law, ordinance, or city charter, the limit in this paragraph applies. new text end new text begin (g) If a county imposes a tax under section 297A.993, the total amount of tax imposed by the county under paragraph (f) and section 297A.993 must not exceed one percent, except that this limit does not apply to taxes authorized under this section or any other law, ordinance, or city charter before June 1, 2023. Upon expiration of a tax authorized under this section or any other law, ordinance, or city charter, the limit in this paragraph applies. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 4. new text begin [297A.9901] SPECIFIED CAPITAL PROJECTS; LOCAL AUTHORIZATION ALLOWED; REQUIREMENTS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Associated bonding costs" means the cost of issuing bonds to finance a specified capital project including but not limited to the costs of issuance of the bonds, capitalized interest, and the payment of principal and interest on the bonds. new text end new text begin (c) "Contributor" has the meaning given in section 297A.9903, subdivision 1, paragraph (f). new text end new text begin (d) "Convention center" means a structure: new text end new text begin (1) that has a minimum of 50,000 square feet for exhibit and meeting spaces; new text end new text begin (2) the square footage of which is expressly designed and constructed for the purposes of presenting conventions, public meetings, and exhibitions, and includes parking facilities that serve the center; and new text end new text begin (3) if located outside the metropolitan area, is more than 15 miles from the nearest existing convention center. new text end new text begin (e) "Correctional facility" means a public facility licensed and inspected by the commissioner of corrections, established and operated for the detention and confinement of adults or juveniles, including but not limited to programs or facilities operating under chapter 401, secure juvenile detention facilities, municipal holding facilities, juvenile temporary holdover facilities, regional or local jails, lockups, work houses, work farms, and detention facilities. new text end new text begin (f) "District court" means one of the ten judicial district courts in the state of Minnesota subject to chapter 484. new text end new text begin (g) "Law enforcement center" means a facility that serves multiple communities and provides public safety functions, including a fire or police station and a facility that provides emergency 911 and dispatch functions, training facilities, court security and support, emergency operations, evidence and record retention, and other public safety services. new text end new text begin (h) "Library" means a library that is part of a regional public library system as designated by the regional library board under section 134.20, excluding a library located within a metropolitan county. new text end new text begin (i) "Metropolitan county" has the meaning given in section 473.121, subdivision 4. new text end new text begin (j) "Park" means a park located entirely outside of a metropolitan county that meets the criteria of regional significance under section 85.536, subdivision 6. new text end new text begin (k) "Political subdivision" means a county located in Minnesota or a statutory or home rule charter city located in Minnesota. new text end new text begin (l) "Regional community center" means a structure that is expressly designed and constructed for the purposes of recreational, cultural, educational, or public group activities, or for civic engagement or social support, serving both residents and nonresidents of the community. new text end new text begin (m) "Regional sports complex" means: new text end new text begin (1) a defined area of sports pavilions, stadiums, gymnasiums, swimming pools, or similar facilities where regional tournaments may be hosted, and where members of the public engage in physical exercise, participate in athletic competitions, witness sporting events, and host regional tournaments; and new text end new text begin (2) which, if located outside the metropolitan area, is more than 15 miles from the nearest existing regional sports complex. new text end new text begin (n) "Qualified recipient" has the meaning given in section 297A.9903, subdivision 1, paragraph (l). new text end new text begin (o) "Specified capital project" means a convention center, correctional facility, district court, law enforcement center, library, park, regional community center, regional sports complex, or trail. new text end new text begin (p) "Trail" means: new text end new text begin (1) a trail of regional significance located entirely outside of a metropolitan county that meets at least three of the criteria specified in items 1 to 5 in the Department of Natural Resources Parks and Trails Legacy Plan dated February 14, 2011, required by Laws 2009, chapter 172, article 3, section 2, paragraph (e); or new text end new text begin (2) a nonstate designated regional or state trail that provides at least an hour of outdoor recreation opportunity or connects to other facilities that can provide at least an hour of recreation in total: new text end new text begin (i) for which the trail or trail extension connects to regional defined assets including a regionally designated park or higher education institution; new text end new text begin (ii) is included in a regional or community trail system plan; or new text end new text begin (iii) connects spaces of 25 acres to other trails or commercial areas. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Policy; requirements. new text end new text begin It is the public policy of the state of Minnesota that local sales taxes are to be used instead of traditional local revenues only for construction and rehabilitation of capital projects when a clear regional benefit beyond the taxing jurisdiction can be demonstrated. Capital projects funded by local sales taxes must serve a regional population, provide economic development benefits and opportunities, or draw individuals to the region. If charged, access fees for the use of capital projects funded by a local sales tax must be equal for residents and nonresidents of the taxing jurisdiction. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Local authorization allowed. new text end new text begin Notwithstanding section 477A.016, or any other law or ordinance, a political subdivision may impose, extend, or modify the uses of a local sales tax to finance a specified capital project without legislative authorization by demonstrating the regional significance of each specified capital project as provided in subdivisions 4 to 6. The authorization under this section applies to an extension to or modification of a local sales tax authorized under special law or the requirements of section 297A.99. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Regional community centers; regional sports complexes. new text end new text begin To impose a local sales tax to fund construction or remodeling of or improvements to a regional community center or regional sports complex, a political subdivision must: new text end new text begin (1) demonstrate that the regional community center meets the requirements of subdivision 1, paragraph (l); or new text end new text begin (2) demonstrate that the regional sports complex meets the requirements of subdivision 1, paragraph (m); and new text end new text begin (3) conduct and present an analysis of the surrounding region to demonstrate that there is no similar facility open to nonresidents at the same cost as to residents. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Criminal justice facilities. new text end new text begin (a) To impose a local sales tax to fund construction or remodeling of or improvements to a correctional facility, a political subdivision must demonstrate the need for the facility by providing: new text end new text begin (1) official documentation of the age of the facility; and new text end new text begin (2)(i) official correspondence from the Department of Corrections that includes an analysis of the facility and description of the improvements or updates needed; or new text end new text begin (ii) if the facility is a joint project between two or more counties, the joint powers agreement or other official documentation between at least one other county demonstrating that the facility will serve public safety functions for the region. new text end new text begin (b) To impose a local sales tax to fund construction or remodeling of or improvements to a district court office, a political subdivision must demonstrate the need for the facility by providing the age of the facility and a description of improvements needed. new text end new text begin (c) To impose a local sales tax to fund construction or remodeling of or improvements to a law enforcement center, a political subdivision must provide resolutions from surrounding counties, statutory or home rule charter cities, or townships affirming that the functions of the law enforcement center will meet the needs of the surrounding county, statutory or home rule charter city, or township. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Convention centers; parks and trails. new text end new text begin (a) To impose a local sales tax to finance construction or remodeling of or improvements to a convention center, a political subdivision must demonstrate that the convention center meets the requirements of subdivision 1, paragraph (d). new text end new text begin (b) To impose a local sales tax to finance construction of or improvements to a park, a political subdivision must demonstrate how the project meets the criteria described in subdivision 1, paragraph (j). new text end new text begin (c) To impose a local sales tax to finance construction of or improvements to a trail, a political subdivision must demonstrate how the project meets the criteria described in subdivision 1, paragraph (p). new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Demonstration of regional benefit; public hearing. new text end new text begin (a) A political subdivision seeking to impose a local sales tax must conduct a public hearing to provide information regarding each specified capital project the political subdivision proposes to fund with the local sales tax. Notice of the hearing must be provided at least 30 days in advance of the hearing and must include: new text end new text begin (1) the tax rate; new text end new text begin (2) a description of each project proposed to be funded by the local sales tax; and new text end new text begin (3) the amount of tax revenue that would be used for each project and the estimated time needed to raise that amount of revenue. new text end new text begin (b) The public must be allowed to speak at the hearing required under paragraph (a). The hearing must not be held before 6:00 p.m. The political subdivision must provide a website address and a telephone number for the political subdivision that members of the public may call if they have questions related to the notice and an address where comments will be received by mail, except that no notice required under this paragraph shall be interpreted as requiring the printing of a personal telephone number or address as the contact information for a political subdivision. If a political subdivision does not maintain a website or public offices where telephone calls can be received by the political subdivision, the notice of the hearing required under paragraph (a) must indicate that the political subdivision does not maintain a website or public offices where telephone calls can be received by the political subdivision. new text end new text begin (c) Political subdivisions are encouraged to obtain demonstrations of support, including letters, resolutions, or other official documentation, of each specified capital project to be funded with revenue from a local sales tax from adjacent political subdivisions and townships. For purposes of this paragraph, a county in which a statutory or home rule charter city or a township is located and a statutory or home rule charter city or township located within a county qualifies as "adjacent." new text end new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Resolution required. new text end new text begin (a) After conducting the public hearing required under subdivision 7, paragraphs (a) and (b), and before the governing body of a political subdivision seeks voter approval to impose a local sales tax, the governing body shall adopt a resolution indicating its approval of the tax. The resolution must include: new text end new text begin (1) the proposed tax rate; new text end new text begin (2) a detailed description of no more than three projects to be funded with revenue from the tax; new text end new text begin (3) documentation of the regional significance of each project, including: new text end new text begin (i) the share of the economic benefit to or use of each project by persons residing or businesses located outside of the jurisdiction; new text end new text begin (ii) demonstration that the project meets the requirements of the applicable definitions in subdivision 1; and new text end new text begin (iii) if applicable, demonstration of support as described in subdivision 7, paragraph (c); new text end new text begin (4) the amount of local sales tax revenue that would be used for each project and the estimated time needed to raise that amount of revenue, inclusive of, if applicable, the contribution share to qualified recipients; and new text end new text begin (5) the total revenue that will be raised for all projects before the tax expires and the estimated length of time that the tax will be in effect if all proposed projects are funded. new text end new text begin (b) The jurisdiction seeking authority to impose a local sales tax by special law must submit the resolution and the documentation required under paragraph (a) to the commissioner pursuant to section 297A.9902. new text end new text begin Subd. 9. new text end new text begin Voter approval required. new text end new text begin (a) Imposition of a local sales tax under this section is subject to approval by voters of the political subdivision at a general or special election. The election must be held within two years of the date the political subdivision receives approval from the commissioner under section 297A.9902 or the date the political subdivision receives legislative authorization under special law. A political subdivision may choose to conduct the election at a general or special election held on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in November. There must be a separate question approving the use of the tax revenue for each project. A project that is not approved by the voters may not be funded with the local sales tax revenue. For purposes of this section, "general election" and "special election" have the meanings given in section 200.02, except that a general election or special election held under this section must be held on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in November. new text end new text begin (b) Each ballot question presented to voters must include: new text end new text begin (1) a description of each specified capital project, including acknowledgment of any state mandate for a government service that necessitates the construction of the project, if applicable; new text end new text begin (2) acknowledgment that the political subdivision is seeking authorization from voters to impose the sales tax; new text end new text begin (3) the total cost of each capital project; new text end new text begin (4) the start date of the project and total project cost that may be generated for a period lasting no longer than 30 years; new text end new text begin (5) the tax rate; new text end new text begin (6) acknowledgment that the total project cost may increase by up to ....... percent and the duration of imposition of the tax may increase by up to ....... years; new text end new text begin (7) a statement that by voting "yes" the voter is voting for the tax at the rate specified in clause (5) to: new text end new text begin (i) impose a new local sales tax; new text end new text begin (ii) increase a local sales tax; or new text end new text begin (iii) extend a local sales tax that would otherwise expire. new text end new text begin (c) The ballot language must not contain any statement that informs voters that by voting "no" the voter acknowledges that the project subject to approval in the question may be funded by increased property taxes. new text end new text begin Subd. 10. new text end new text begin Administration; termination. new text end new text begin (a) The proceeds of the tax must be dedicated exclusively to payment of the construction and rehabilitation costs and associated bonding costs related to the specified capital projects approved by the voters under subdivision 9, paragraph (a), and, if applicable, contribution share issued to a political subdivision that is a contributor for which no qualified recipient exists equalization distributions. The political subdivision must not commingle revenue from a tax approved by the voters under this section with revenue from a local sales tax authorized under section 297A.99 or any other law, ordinance, city charter, or other provision, including an extension of or modification to the uses of a local sales tax for a different project. new text end new text begin (b) The political subdivision imposing the tax must notify the commissioner at least 90 days before the date the political subdivision anticipates that revenues raised from the tax are sufficient to fund the projects approved by the voters under subdivision 9, paragraph (a). The notification applies to each authorization of a tax and each project approved by the voters under subdivision 9, paragraph (a), regardless of whether the legislature has authorized the tax notwithstanding the requirements of paragraph (c). The tax must terminate after the revenues raised are sufficient to fund the projects approved by the voters under subdivision 9, paragraph (a). The political subdivision must notify the commissioner within 30 days of the date that sufficient revenues have been raised to fund the projects approved by the voters under subdivision 9, paragraph (a). new text end new text begin (c) After a sales tax imposed by a political subdivision has expired or been terminated, the political subdivision is prohibited from imposing a local sales tax for a period of one year. new text end new text begin (d) If a tax is terminated because sufficient revenues have been raised, any amount of tax collected after sufficient revenues have been raised and before the quarterly termination required under section 297A.99, subdivision 12, paragraph (a), that is greater than the average quarterly revenues collected over the immediately preceding 12 calendar months, must be retained by the commissioner for deposit in the general fund. new text end new text begin Subd. 11. new text end new text begin Other provisions apply. new text end new text begin (a) The provisions of section 297A.99, subdivisions 1, paragraph (d), and 4 to 13, apply to taxes authorized under this subdivision. new text end new text begin (b) All contracts for construction of specified capital projects under this section that are located in a metropolitan county are subject to the requirement to pay the prevailing wage rate, as defined in section 177.42, subdivision 6, and to the requirements and enforcement provisions of sections 177.27, 177.30, 177.32, 177.41 to 177.435, 177.44, and 177.45. For purposes of complying with sections 177.30, paragraph (a), clauses (6) and (7), and 177.41 to 177.435, the political subdivision imposing the tax is the contracting authority and contracting agency and the project is considered a public works project. new text end new text begin (c) The total tax rate imposed by a political subdivision under this section and section 297A.99 must not exceed one-half of one percent. new text end new text begin (d) If a county imposes a tax under section 297A.993, the total amount of tax imposed by the county under paragraph (c) and section 297A.993 must not exceed one percent. new text end new text begin (e) The maximum collection period for a tax imposed under this section is the earlier of the amount of time necessary to collect the revenue equal to the cost of the specified capital projects approved by the voters, including as associated bonding costs, or 30 years. new text end new text begin Subd. 12. new text end new text begin Bonds; authorization. new text end new text begin (a) A political subdivision may issue bonds under chapter 475 to finance all or a portion of the costs of a specified capital project. The aggregate principal amount of bonds issued must not exceed the cost of a qualifying capital project approved by the voters, plus associated bonding costs. The bonds may be paid from or secured by any funds available to the political subdivision, including the tax authorized under this section and approved by the voters. The issuance of bonds under this subdivision is not subject to sections 275.60 and 275.61. new text end new text begin (b) A separate election to approve the bonds under section 475.58 is not required. new text end new text begin Subd. 13. new text end new text begin Filing and imposition requirements. new text end new text begin (a) A political subdivision that has received approval to impose a tax from the commissioner under this section must file a certificate of local approval with the secretary of state within 60 days after receiving voter approval for the tax to be lawfully imposed. If the tax is approved by the voters, the political subdivision must impose the tax within 15 months of receiving the voter approval. If the tax is not imposed within 15 months, the authority to impose the tax under this section expires. new text end new text begin (b) If, after receiving voter approval, a political subdivision cancels a project approved by the voters, the political subdivision must notify the commissioner. The commissioner must proportionately decrease the maximum amount of tax revenue the political subdivision may collect. If the political subdivision has already collected revenue for the canceled project, the political subdivision must return the funds to the commissioner for deposit to the general fund. The political subdivision must use any other source of revenue available to pay any outstanding debt on the bonds that were issued for the canceled project. new text end new text begin Subd. 14. new text end new text begin Allowance for inflation. new text end new text begin (a) Before the expiration of the 15-month period under subdivision 13, paragraph (a), a political subdivision may increase the amount approved by the voters to finance the specified capital project or the amount of time the tax may be imposed as approved by the voters to collect revenues sufficient to fund the specified capital project, or both. new text end new text begin (b) The total cost of the specified project as approved by the voters under subdivision 9, paragraph (b), clause (3), may be increased by the greater of: new text end new text begin (1) .......; or new text end new text begin (2) ....... plus the rate of change in inflation according to the Producer Price Index for New Nonresidential Building Construction published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics for the period beginning ....... and ending ........ new text end new text begin (c) A political subdivision exercising the options under paragraphs (a) and (b) must adopt a resolution documenting the need for the increase in project cost or duration of imposition of the tax, or both. The political subdivision must file the resolution with the commissioner and the ....... within ....... days of adopting the resolution, but not after the 15-month period under subdivision 13, paragraph (a), has expired. new text end new text begin Subd. 15. new text end new text begin Collection and retention. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner shall remit the proceeds of the tax, less refunds and a proportionate share described in clauses (1) and (2), at least quarterly, to the political subdivision. The commissioner shall deduct from the proceeds distributed to a political subdivision an amount that equals: new text end new text begin (1) not more than one percent for the direct and indirect costs of the department to administer, audit, and collect the tax, of which a portion must be used for the cost of constructing and maintaining a zip code or geocode database necessary for local sales tax collections under the Streamlined Sales and Use Tax Agreement in section 297A.995; and new text end new text begin (2) the political subdivision's contribution share of the amount to be paid under section 297A.9903, pursuant to the requirements of subdivision 16. new text end new text begin (b) The revenue under paragraph (a), clause (1), must be deposited into the Revenue Department service and recovery special revenue fund established under section 270C.15. new text end new text begin (c) The revenue retained under paragraph (a), clause (2), must be deposited into the local sales tax equalization distribution account. new text end new text begin Subd. 16. new text end new text begin Contribution share. new text end new text begin The amount of tax that the commissioner must retain under subdivision 15, paragraph (a), clause (2), is equal to: new text end new text begin (1) five percent for a political subdivision whose tax is authorized and imposed under this section; new text end new text begin (2) five percent for a political subdivision that amends, extends, or otherwise modifies a tax that was authorized and imposed by special law before July 1, 2025; or new text end new text begin (3) eight percent for a political subdivision that is authorized by special law to impose a new tax after June 30, 2025. new text end new text begin Subd. 17. new text end new text begin Accounts established; transfer. new text end new text begin The local sales tax equalization distribution account is established in the special revenue fund. Funds in the account must be distributed in accordance with section 297A.9903. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 5. new text begin [297A.9902] LOCAL SALES TAXES; OVERSIGHT. new text end new text begin (a) A political subdivision seeking to impose a local sales tax under the provisions of section 297A.9901 must file a copy of the resolution and documentation required under section 297A.9901, subdivision 8, paragraph (a), clause (3), with the commissioner by October 31 of the first year before the political subdivision seeks voter approval of the tax. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner must verify whether a project included in the submission under paragraph (a) meets the requirements of section 297A.9901, subdivisions 1 and 4 to 8. By January 10 of the first year in which the political subdivision must seek voter approval of a local sales tax authorized under section 297A.9901, subdivision 9, paragraph (a), the commissioner must notify the political subdivision of the commissioner's determination. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 6. new text begin [297A.9903] LOCAL SALES TAX EQUALIZATION DISTRIBUTIONS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For the purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "City" means a statutory or home rule charter city. new text end new text begin (c) "City sharing pool" means a city or cities that are qualified recipients of a distribution from the same contributor's contribution share. For a contributor that is a city located in a metropolitan county, the city sharing pool consists of cities that are qualified recipients and are contiguous to the contributor. For a contributor that is a city located outside of a metropolitan county, the city sharing pool consists of cities that are qualified recipients and are located in the same county as the contributor. new text end new text begin (d) "Commissioner" means commissioner of revenue. new text end new text begin (e) "Contribution share" means the percentage of the total local sales taxes that were collected by a political subdivision in the previous calendar year pursuant to section 297A.9901, subdivision 16. new text end new text begin (f) "Contributor" means a political subdivision that: new text end new text begin (1) authorizes and imposes a local sales tax under section 297A.9901; new text end new text begin (2) amends, extends, or otherwise modifies a tax that was authorized before July 1, 2025; or new text end new text begin (3) is authorized by special law to impose a new tax after June 30, 2025. new text end new text begin (g) "County sharing pool" means a county or counties that are qualified recipients of a distribution from the same contributor's contribution share. For a county that is a contributor, the sharing pool consists of counties that are qualified recipients and are contiguous to the contributor. new text end new text begin (h) "Local sales tax" means: new text end new text begin (1) a local sales tax imposed under section 297A.9901; new text end new text begin (2) a local sales tax imposed under section 297A.99; or new text end new text begin (3) a local sales tax imposed under special law. new text end new text begin (i) "Metropolitan county" has the meaning given in section 473.121, subdivision 4. new text end new text begin (j) "Political subdivision" has the meaning given in section 297A.9901, subdivision 1, paragraph (j). new text end new text begin (k) "Population" means the population estimated or established, as of January 1 in the year distributions under this section are calculated, by the most recent federal census; by a special census conducted under contract with the United States Bureau of the Census; or by a population estimate of the state demographer made pursuant to section 4A.02, whichever is the most recent. new text end new text begin (l) "Qualified recipient" means a political subdivision that is qualified to receive a distribution under this section and: new text end new text begin (1) does not meet the definition of contributor; new text end new text begin (2) did not impose a local sales tax in the prior calendar year; and new text end new text begin (3) is: new text end new text begin (i) a city that is: new text end new text begin (A) contiguous to a city located in a metropolitan county and included in the definition of contributor in the prior calendar year; or new text end new text begin (B) located in a county outside of the metropolitan area where at least one city is included in the definition of contributor in the prior calendar year; or new text end new text begin (ii) a county that is contiguous to a county that is included in the definition of contributor in the prior calendar year. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Contribution share. new text end new text begin The commissioner must annually retain each contributor's contribution share. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Distribution share; requirements. new text end new text begin (a) In order to receive a distribution share, a qualified recipient must adopt a resolution supporting a proposed local sales tax implemented by a contributor to the commissioner by October 31 of the year before the contributor seeks voter approval of the tax. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner must divide each contributor's contribution share among all qualified recipients in the contributor's city sharing pool or county sharing pool, in proportion to the population of the political subdivisions in the sharing pool. A qualified recipient's distribution is the sum of the shares from all eligible sharing pools. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Certification. new text end new text begin The commissioner must annually calculate and certify each political subdivision's contribution share and each qualified recipient's distribution based on local sales taxes collected in the prior calendar year. If no qualified recipients exist for a political subdivision that is a contributor, the contribution share retained under subdivision 2 shall be paid to that political subdivision, and those funds shall be subject to the requirements under section 297A.9901, subdivision 10, paragraph (a). The commissioner must provide notice of the certification to each political subdivision by January 31. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Payment. new text end new text begin By March 15 annually, the commissioner of revenue must pay to each qualified recipient the distribution or contribution share certified under subdivision 4. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin The amount required to make distributions under this section is appropriated from the local sales tax equalization distribution account established under section 297A.9901, subdivision 17, to the commissioner of revenue. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 7. new text begin REPEALER.new text end new text begin Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 297A.99, subdivision 3a, new text end new text begin is repealed. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end APPENDIX Repealed Minnesota Statutes: 25-01074 297A.99 LOCAL SALES TAXES. Subd. 3a. Temporary moratorium. (a) Notwithstanding subdivisions 1, 2, and 3, until after May 31, 2025, a political subdivision may not engage in any of the following activities in connection with imposing a new local sales and use tax or modifying an existing local sales and use tax: (1) any activity described in subdivision 1, paragraph (d); (2) adopt a resolution; or (3) seek voter approval. (b) Paragraph (a) does not apply to new local sales and use taxes or modifications to existing local sales and use taxes authorized in May, 2023. (c) This subdivision expires June 1, 2025.